Massachusetts, session 194th, S2169.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 42(b)(1) of chapter 23G of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official
Edition, is hereby amended by striking the third sentence in the definition of “Cultural facility”
and inserting in place thereof:- Municipally or tribal government owned buildings, structures, or
sites of which at least 50 per cent is used as a cultural facility.
of 1